Utah statutes.
51-7-22.5.   Enforcement.

(1)  Whenever it appears to the council that any person has engaged, is engaging, or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of this chapter or any rule issued under authority of this chapter:

(a)  the council may bring an action in the appropriate district court of this state or the appropriate court of another state to enjoin the acts or practices and to enforce compliance with this chapter or any rule under this chapter; and

(b)  upon a proper showing in an action brought under this section, the court may:

(i)  issue a permanent or temporary, prohibitory, or mandatory injunction;

(ii)  issue a restraining order or writ of mandamus or other extraordinary writ;

(iii)  enter a declaratory judgment;

(iv)  order disgorgement;

(v)  order rescission;

(vi)  impose a fine of not more than $50,000 for each violation of the chapter; or

(vii)  provide any other relief that the court considers appropriate.

(2)  An indictment or information may not be returned nor may a civil complaint be filed under this chapter more than five years after discovery of the alleged violation.



Enacted by Chapter 248, 2004 General Session

